Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.845

Lead contamination in drinking water in school buildings—Department of health as lead agency—Waiver.

(1) To the fullest extent permitted by federal law, the department, rather than community water systems, is designated as the lead or principal agency in regard to lead in drinking water sampling, testing, notification, remediation, public education, and other actions at public and private elementary and secondary schools as required by the federal lead and copper rule, 40 C.F.R. Part 141.

(2) The department must issue a written waiver that exempts community water systems that serve schools from the sampling and testing requirements of 40 C.F.R. Part 141.92 related to schools if the department determines that the mandatory requirements for sampling and testing for, and remediation of, lead contamination in drinking water outlets at elementary and secondary schools under chapter 154, Laws of 2021 are consistent with the requirements in 40 C.F.R. Part 141.92 of the federal lead and copper rule.

[ 2021 c 154 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2021 c 154: See notes following RCW 43.70.830.